Tennessee, session 114, HB1076.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-5-105(a), is amended by deleting
"thirty (30) days" and substituting "twenty-one (21) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1076
002654
- 1 -